Utah statutes.
48-2c-1601 (Repealed 07/01/13).   Law governing foreign companies.

(1)  This chapter does not authorize this state to regulate the organization or internal affairs of a foreign company.  The laws of the state or other jurisdiction under which a foreign company is organized govern its organization and internal affairs and the liability of its managers, members, and assignees of members.

(2)  A foreign company may not be denied authority to transact business in this state by reason of any difference between the laws of another jurisdiction under which the foreign company is organized and the laws of this state.



Enacted by Chapter 260, 2001 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

